Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.030

Perjury in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of perjury in the second degree if, in an examination under oath under the terms of a contract of insurance, or with intent to mislead a public servant in the performance of his or her duty, he or she makes a materially false statement, which he or she knows to be false under an oath required or authorized by law.

(2) Perjury in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2001 c 171 s 3. Prior: 1995 c 285 s 31; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.030.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 171: See notes following RCW 9A.72.010.

Effective date—1995 c 285: See RCW 48.30A.900.